District of Columbia statutes.
22-2713

Premises occupied for lewdness, assignation, or prostitution declared nuisance.

(a)

Whoever shall erect, establish, continue, maintain, use, own, occupy, or release any building, erection, or place used for the purpose of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution in the District of Columbia is guilty of a nuisance, and the building, erection, or place, or the ground itself in or upon which such lewdness, assignation, or prostitution is conducted, permitted, or carried on, continued, or exists, and the furniture, fixtures, musical instruments, and contents are also declared a nuisance, and shall be enjoined and abated as hereinafter provided.

(b)

Whoever shall erect, establish, continue, maintain, use, own, occupy, or release any building, erection, or place which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of Chapter 9 of Title 48, for the purpose of using any of these substances or for the purpose of keeping or selling any of these substances in violation of Chapter 9 of Title 48, is guilty of a nuisance, and the building, erection, or place, or the ground itself in or upon which such activity is conducted, permitted, or carried on, continued, or exists, and the furniture, fixtures, and contents thereof, are also declared a nuisance and disorderly house, and shall be enjoined and abated as hereinafter provided.

History

Feb. 7, 1914, 38 Stat. 280, ch. 16, § 1
June 19, 1998, D.C. Law 12-127, § 2(a), 45 DCR 1304

Cross References

Action to abate, enjoin, and prevent a drug-related nuisance, where there is reason to believe such exists, see § 42-3101 et seq.
Chief of Police, authority and duty in regard to houses of prostitution, see §§ 5-115.06 and 5-115.07.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-2714, § 22-2717, and § 22-2720.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2713.
1973 Ed., § 22-2713.